Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.025

Computation of rates—Publication in the Washington State Register.

Each month the state treasurer shall compute the highest rate of interest permissible under RCW 19.52.020(1), and the rate of interest required by RCW 4.56.110(3) and 4.56.115, for the succeeding calendar month. The treasurer shall file these rates with the state code reviser for publication in the next available issue of the Washington State Register in compliance with RCW 34.08.020(8).

[ 2004 c 185 s 4; 1986 c 60 s 1.]